Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 4.5
PEST CONTROL COMPACT

35-4.5-101 and 35-4.5-102. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire article repealed, (SB 15-021), ch. 20, p. 50, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2007 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2015. For the text of this article prior to 2015, consult the 2014 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.